src/morphology/stems/adj.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_YKSILÖITY
!!  The gradation of t ~ d after u is in class {{@LEXNAME@}}, the
!!  dictionary class for this is ¹⁻F.
!!  The commonest t ~ d variation in u stems comes from nut participle’s
!!  passive’s front form (-ty).
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~d y
!!€  yksilöity: yksilöity+A+Sg+Nom # singled
!!€  yksilöidyssä: yksilöity+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  yksilöityihin: yksilöity+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  yksilöidyistä: yksilöity+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  yksilöidympi: yksilöity+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  yksilöidyin: yksilöity+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:dy  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:dy  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:dy  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:dy  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  And there's none with t and ö

LEXICON ADJ_LENKO
!!  The adjectives with -nko stem belong to class {{@LEXNAME@}}, and the
!!  dictionary class was ¹⁻G.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~g o
!!€  lenko: lenko+A+Sg+Nom # crooked
!!€  lengossa: lenko+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  lengoista: lenko+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  lenkoihin: lenko+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  lengompi: lenko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  lengoin: lenko+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:go  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:go  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:go  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:go  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  There's no adjectives ending in nku
!!  nor with y and nk
!!  And ö with nk
!!  There are no gradating p's after m's in unchanging stems
!!  For all these, check the noun patterns.
!
LEXICON ADJ_MELTO
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after l in o stems is in class 
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~l o
!!€  melto: melto+A+Sg+Nom # ?????
!!€  mellossa: melto+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  meltoihin: melto+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  melloista: melto+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  mellompi: melto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  melloin: melto+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:to  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:lo  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:lo  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:lo  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:lo  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_PARANNELTU
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after l in o stems is in class 
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
!!  The common u stem after l is in nut participles passive (-tu):
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~l u
!!€  paranneltu: paranneltu+A+Sg+Nom # embettered
!!€  parannellussa: paranneltu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  paranneltuihin: paranneltu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  parannelluista: paranneltu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  parannellumpi: paranneltu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  parannelluin: paranneltu+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:lu  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:lu  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:lu  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:lu  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after l in o stems is in class 
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
!!  As with y and t:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~l y
!!€  vähätelty: vähätelty+A+Sg+Nom # belittled
!!€  vähätellyssä: vähätelty+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  vähäteltyihin: vähätelty+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  vähätellyistä: vähätelty+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  vähätellympi: vähätelty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  vähätellyin: vähätelty+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ly  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ly  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ly  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ly  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There's no adjective ending -ltö in our lexical database.

LEXICON ADJ_VENTO
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after n in o stems is in class 
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~n o
!!€  vento: vento+A+Sg+Nom # ?
!!€  vennossa: vento+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  ventoihin: vento+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  vennoista: vento+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  vennompi: vento+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  vennoin: vento+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:to  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:no  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:no  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:no  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:no  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_PANTU
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after n in u stems is in class 
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
!!  The common u stem after n is in nut participle’s passive’s back form (-tu):
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~n u
!!€  pantu: pantu+A+Sg+Nom # brewed
!!€  pannussa: pantu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  pantuihin: pantu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  pannuista: pantu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  pannumpi: pantu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  pannuin: pantu+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:nu  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:nu  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:nu  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:nu  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_MENTY
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after n in y stems is in class 
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
!!  The common u stem after n is in nut participle’s passive’s front form
!!  (-ty):
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~n y
!!€  menty: menty+A+Sg+Nom # belittled
!!€  mennyssä: menty+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  mentyihin: menty+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  mennyistä: menty+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  mennympi: menty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  mennyin: menty+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ny  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ny  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ny  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ny  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no adjectives ending in -ntö

LEXICON ADJ_MARTO
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after r in o stems is in class
!!  {{@LEXNAME@}}, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~r o
!!€  marto: marto+A+Sg+Nom # ???
!!€  marrossa: marto+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  martoihin: marto+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  marroista: marto+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  marrompi: marto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  marroin: marto+A+Sup+Sg+Nom
0:to  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ro  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ro  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ro  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ro  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJECTIVE
ajeltu+A:ajel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
arveltu+A:arvel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
aseteltu+A:asetel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
ei-eroteltu+A:ei-erotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
eieroteltu+A:ei#erotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
epäilty+A:epäil  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
eritelty+A:eritel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
esikäsitelty+A:esikäsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
geenimuunneltu+A:geenimuunnel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
haaveiltu+A:haaveil  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
hahmoteltu+A:hahmotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
hemmoteltu+A:hemmotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
hento+A:hen  ADJ_VENTO  ;
hintasäännöstelty+A:hintasäännöstel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
hintasäännöstelty+A:hinta#säännöstel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
huoliteltu+A:huolitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
hyytelöity+A:hyytelöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
hätiköity+A:hätiköi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
ihailtu+A:ihail  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
ikävöity+A:ikävöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
jaeltu+A:jael  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
jaoteltu+A:jaotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
juoniteltu+A:juonitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
jäljitelty+A:jäljitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
kaunisteltu+A:kaunistel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
koristeltu+A:koristel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
kuultu+A:kuul  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
kuviteltu+A:kuvitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
käsinommeltu+A:käsinommel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
käsitelty+A:käsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
laiminlyöty+A:laiminlyö  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
lajiteltu+A:lajitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
leikelty+A:leikel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
lenko+A:len  ADJ_LENKO  ;
liioiteltu+A:liioitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
loppuunmyyty+A:loppuunmyy  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
luokiteltu+A:luokitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
luonnosteltu+A:luonnostel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
luultu+A:luul  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
lyöty+A:lyö  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
lämpökäsitelty+A:lämpökäsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
marto+A:mar  ADJ_MARTO  ;
melto+A:mel  ADJ_MELTO  ;
menty+A:men  ADJ_MENTY  ;
mitätöity+A:mitätöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
muotoiltu+A:muotoil  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
muotoonommeltu+A:muotoonommel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
myyty+A:myy  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
määritelty+A:määritel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
neliöity+A:neliöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
neuvoteltu+A:neuvotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
näytelty+A:näytel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
ommeltu+A:ommel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
pahoinpidelty+A:pahoinpidel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
paloiteltu+A:paloitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
pantu+A:pan  ADJ_PANTU  ;
paranneltu+A:parannel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
peitelty+A:peitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
peloteltu+A:pelotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
perusteltu+A:perustel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
pintakäsitelty+A:pintakäsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
puolikäsitelty+A:puolikäsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
puolikäsitelty+A:puoli#käsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
puolusteltu+A:puolustel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
pysäköity+A:pysäköi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
ravisteltu+A:ravistel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
rekisteröity+A:rekisteröi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
rento+A:ren  ADJ_VENTO  ;
ripoteltu+A:ripotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
ryhmitelty+A:ryhmitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
seppelöity+A:seppelöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
siloteltu+A:silotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
sinetöity+A:sinetöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
soviteltu+A:sovitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
suojeltu+A:suojel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
suunniteltu+A:suunnitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
säädelty+A:säädel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
säännöstelty+A:säännöstel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
tavoiteltu+A:tavoitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
teeskennelty+A:teeskennel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
turmeltu+A:turmel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
tyylitelty+A:tyylitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
tärvelty+A:tärvel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
uudelleenjärjestelty+A:uudelleenjärjestel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
varusteltu+A:varustel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
vento+A:ven  ADJ_VENTO  ;
viimeistelty+A:viimeistel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
viljelty+A:viljel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
viraltapantu+A:viraltapan  ADJ_PANTU  ;
voideltu+A:voidel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
vähätelty+A:vähätel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
väärinkohdeltu+A:väärinkohdel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
väärinkohdeltu+A:väärin#kohdel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
vääristelty+A:vääristel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
yksilöity+A:yksilöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
ympäröity+A:ympäröi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
